Illinois, session 104th, SB766.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Watercraft Use Tax Law is amended by 5changing Section 15-1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 158/15-1)7    Sec. 15-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Watercraft Use Tax Law, and references in this Article to 9"this Law" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 93-840, eff. 7-30-04.)